Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1008
Transportation services bureau; created;
responsibility.

There is hereby created within the Department
of Administrative Services the transportation services bureau which shall
provide service and guidance to all state agencies in the utilization, operation, and servicing of bureau fleet vehicles and the utilization of
privately owned vehicles used for state purposes. The transportation services
bureau shall be responsible for monitoring all transportation requirements
of the state and maintaining complete records thereon.

Laws 1969, c. 770, § 1, p. 2918;

Laws 2012, LB779, § 1.